Maryland, session 2026, SB0351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
12–106.
(b) This section applies only to a binder or policy, other than a renewal policy, of
personal insurance, commercial property insurance, and commercial liability insurance.
12–307.
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 12–106 OF THIS TITLE, WITH RESPECT TO PRIVATE
PASSENGER MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES THAT MEASURE THE
OPERATION OF AN INSURED VEHICLE, AN INSURER MAY NOT INITIATE A PREMIUM
INCREASE IN INCREMENTS OF LESS THAN 6 MONTHS FROM THE DATE THE POLICY
GOES INTO EFFECT.
19–521.
(A) (1) AN INSURER THAT ISSUES OR DELIVERS PRIVATE PASSENGER
MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES IN THE STATE SHALL DISCLOSE TO THE
APPLICANT AT THE TIME OF APPLICATION OR THE POLICYHOLDER AT THE TIME OF
RENEWAL ANY USE OF A PROGRAM THAT MEASURES THE OPERATION OF AN
INSURED VEHICLE.
(2) THE DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(B) AN INSURER THAT ISSUES OR DELIVERS PRIVATE PASSENGER MOTOR
VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES IN THE STATE AND THAT IMPLEMENTS THE USE OF
A PROGRAM THAT MEASURES THE OPERATION OF AN INSURED VEHICLE SHALL

SENATE BILL 351 3
ESTABLISH A PROCESS BY WHICH THE POLICYHOLDER MAY CORRECT OR APPEAL
DATA COLLECTED THROUGH THE PROGRAM THAT THE POLICYHOLDER BELIEVES IS
ERRONEOUS.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO LIMIT THE
TYPES AND AMOUNT OF DATA THAT MAY BE COLLECTED BY A PROGRAM THAT
MEASURES THE OPERATION OF AN INSURED VEHICLE FOR USE BY AN INSURER THAT
ISSUES OR DELIVERS PRIVATE PASSENGER MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES
IN THE STATE.
(D) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REQUIRE AN INSURER THAT ISSUES OR
DELIVERS PRIVATE PASSENGER MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICIES IN THE
STATE AND THAT USES A PROGRAM THAT MEASURES THE OPERATION OF AN
INSURED VEHICLE TO ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT A GOVERNANCE PLAN THAT
INCLUDES:
(1) MONITORING THE PROGRAM TO ENSURE THAT IT DOES NOT
COLLECT OR PROCESS DATA IN A MANNER THAT IS UNFAIRLY DISCRIMINATORY,
IMPACTS PREMIUM RATES IN A MANNER THAT LACKS ACTUARIAL JUSTIFICATION,
OR OTHERWISE VIOLATES THIS ARTICLE;
(2) CORRECTING OR MITIGATING A FINDING THAT THE PROGRAM
COLLECTS OR PROCESSES DATA IN A MANNER THAT IS UNFAIRLY DISCRIMINATORY,
IMPACTS PREMIUM RATES IN A MANNER THAT LACKS ACTUARIAL JUSTIFICATION,
OR OTHERWISE VIOLATES THIS ARTICLE; AND
(3) PERIODICALLY REPORTING TO THE ADMINISTRATION ON:
(I) THE SCOPE, METHODOLOGIES, AND FINDINGS OF THE
PROGRAM MONITORING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GOVERNANCE PLAN; AND
(II) ANY CORRECTIVE ACTION OR MITIGATION MEASURE TAKEN
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GOVERNANCE PLAN.
27–501.
(t) With respect to private passenger motor vehicle insurance, an insurer may
not:
(1) require an applicant or a policyholder to participate in a program that
measures the operation of an insured vehicle as a condition for underwriting a private
passenger motor vehicle insurance risk [unless the insurer:

SENATE BILL 351
(1) only offers private passenger motor vehicle insurance products that
require insureds to participate in a program that measures the operation of an insured
vehicle;
(2) discloses the information in item (1) of this subsection to:
(i) the applicant at the time of application; and
(ii) the policyholder at the time of renewal; and
(3) includes the information in item (1) of this subsection in any advertising
materials for the insurance products offered by the insurer]; OR
(2) USE DATA COLLECTED THROUGH A PROGRAM THAT MEASURES
THE OPERATION OF AN INSURED VEHICLE TO CANCEL, REFUSE TO RENEW, OR
REFUSE TO UNDERWRITE A PRIVATE PASSENGER AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE POLICY
RISK.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Insurance
Administration shall adopt the regulations required under § 19–521(c) of the Insurance
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
private passenger automobile insurance policies issued or renewed in the State on or after
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026 January 1, 2027.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.